Utah statutes.
16-13-5.   Bonds or securities, capital stock of development corporations --
Authority to purchase, hold, or dispose of -- Rights of holders -- Rights of
financial institutions.
(1)  All persons, firms, partnerships, associations, trusts and domestic and
foreign corporations organized or authorized to do business in this state,
including, without implied limitation, all financial institutions, public
utility corporations and insurance corporations, are hereby authorized to
acquire, purchase, hold, sell, assign, transfer, mortgage, pledge, or
otherwise dispose of any bonds, securities or other evidences of indebtedness
created by a development corporation, and to exercise all the rights, powers
and privileges of ownership thereof, all without the approval of any
regulatory authority of the state.
(2)  All persons, firms, partnerships, associations, trusts, domestic and
foreign corporations organized or authorized to do business in this state,
including without implied limitation all public utility corporations and
insurance corporations, other than financial institutions, are hereby
authorized to acquire, purchase, hold, sell, assign, transfer, mortgage,
pledge, or otherwise dispose of any of the shares of the capital stock of a
development corporation, and while owners of said stock to exercise all the
rights, powers and privileges of ownership, including the right to vote
thereon, all without the approval of any regulatory authority of the state.
(3)  All financial institutions are hereby authorized to become lenders to
development corporations and to make loans to the corporations as provided
herein, without the approval of any regulatory authority of the state.
(4)  A financial institution is authorized to acquire, purchase, hold, sell,
assign, transfer, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, any bonds,
securities or other evidences of indebtedness created by the corporation in
accordance with its provisions for the call of loans, and any of the shares of
the capital stock of the corporation, and while owners thereof, to exercise
all the rights, powers and privileges of ownership, including the right to
vote, all without approval of any regulatory authority of the state; provided,
that the amount of the capital stock of the corporation which may be acquired
by any lender pursuant to the authority granted herein may not exceed 10% of
the loan limit of such lender.  The amount of capital stock of the corporation
which any lender is authorized to acquire pursuant to the authority granted
herein is in addition to the amount of capital stock in corporations which
such lender may otherwise be authorized to acquire.
